Hawaii statutes.
§342C-2 Prohibited acts. (a)
Effective January 1, 1991, no person in this State shall sell or offer for
sale any CFC refrigerant suitable for use in air conditioners or mobile air
conditioners in containers that are smaller than fifteen pounds net.

(b) No person in this State shall wilfully
cause or allow CFCs to be released into the air from any source or process
regulated by this chapter, other than through common use of a product, or in
the course of attempting to recover, recycle, or safely dispose of CFCs while
exercising due care to prevent unnecessary releases of CFCs into the air to the
extent practicable and in compliance with applicable rules.

(c) Effective July 1, 1993, no person in
this State shall:

(1) Purchase, distribute, manufacture, import, sell,
or offer for sale, any portable fire extinguisher that contains a halon or
other ozone-depleting compound; or

(2) Repair, service, or perform maintenance on any
portable fire extinguishing system or unit without using a reclamation system to
recapture, recycle, or properly dispose of unspent halons or other
ozone-depleting compounds.

Exempted from this prohibition is the sale of
portable halon fire extinguishers for use in aircraft, which may be sold to
purchasing agents of airline companies, or to private individuals upon
presentation of a pilots license. [L 1990, c 316, pt of §2; am L 1992, c 264,
§3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next